Louisiana, session 2026, HB882.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:461.4(A)(3)(b) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§461.4. Recognition of customary uses; construction standards
A. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Part, outdoor advertising
shall be permitted in areas zoned industrial or commercial and in unzoned
commercial and industrial areas as hereafter defined, including all land, buildings,
or other structures controlled, owned, or operated by the state, or any political
subdivision, or any public entity thereof, provided they are located in zoned or
unzoned commercial or industrial areas and meet the size, lighting, and spacing
requirements as set forth in the "Federal-State Agreement For Carrying Out National
Policy Relative to Control of Outdoor Advertising in Areas Adjacent to the National
System of Interstate and Defense Highways and the Federal-Aid Primary System",
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-32 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 882
subject to the following regulations which are declared to be consistent with
customary use in this state:
* * *
(3) Spacing of signs
* * *
(b)(i) No two sign structures facing in the same direction subject to
regulations under this Part shall be spaced less than one hundred fifty one thousand
feet apart unless separated by a building, structure, or roadway. , except that no
outdoor advertising sign shall be permitted within one thousand feet of any other
permitted outdoor advertising sign along, and on the same side of, an interstate
highway, excluding official and "on premise" signs as defined in Section 131(c) of
Title 23, United States Code.
(ii) No outdoor advertising sign shall be permitted within one thousand feet
of any other permitted outdoor advertising sign along, and on the same side of, any
interstate highway, freeway, or non-freeway on the Federal-Aid Primary System or
the National Highway System, excluding official and "on-premise" signs as provided
in 23 CFR Part 750.105.
(iii) Any outdoor advertising sign for which a permit was lawfully issued
on or after January 1, 2010, that was damaged or destroyed in full or in part by an act
of God shall be considered a legal nonconforming sign and may be rebuilt, enhanced,
or re-permitted.
* * *
B. The department, however, is authorized to modify, vary or supplement the
above restrictions if necessary to comply with the standards approved by the
Congress of the United States and to insure ensure that the department will receive
the maximum amount of federal-aid funds as provided in the Federal Highway
Beautification Act of 1965.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-32 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 882